Illinois, session 104th, HB2975.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.14a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Restrictions on cellular telephone use. A 8school board shall prohibit a student from using a cellular 9telephone in a school or on school property while the student 10is attending class. This restriction shall not apply during 11lunch, recess, passing periods, or emergency situations. 12    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.14a new)13    Sec. 34-18.14a. Restrictions on cellular telephone use. 14The board shall prohibit a student from using a cellular 15telephone in a school or on school property while the student 16is attending class. This restriction shall not apply during 17lunch, recess, passing periods, or emergency situations. 18    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.28 rep.)19    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.14 rep.)20    Section 10. The School Code is amended by repealing 21Sections 10-20.28 and 34-18.14.